Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 35 Responsibility of Parking Lots

31-35-1.
Ordinances requiring theft and damage insurance coverage.

Each city and town in this state is authorized and empowered to pass ordinances requiring every person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of parking motor vehicles on outdoor parking lots to take out a blanket insurance, by the terms of which any motor vehicle owner, whose motor vehicle has been left in the outdoor parking lot, in the event of theft of or damage to the motor vehicle, may be recompensed from the insurance for the theft or damages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1209, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-35-1

.